Washington statutes.
RCW 19.295.005

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds the practice of using "living trusts" as a marketing tool by persons who are not authorized to practice law, who are not acting directly under the supervision of a person authorized to practice law, who are not a financial institution, or who are not properly credentialed and regulated professionals as specified under RCW 19.295.020 (5) and (6) for purposes of gathering information for the preparation of an estate distribution document to be a deceptive means of obtaining personal asset information and of developing and generating leads for sales to senior citizens. The legislature further finds that this practice endangers the financial security of consumers and may frustrate their estate planning objectives. Therefore, the legislature intends to prohibit the marketing of services related to preparation of estate distribution documents by persons who are not authorized to practice law or who are not a financial institution.

This chapter is not intended to limit consumers from obtaining legitimate estate planning documents, including "living trusts," from those authorized to practice law; but is intended to prohibit persons not licensed to engage in the practice of law from the unscrupulous practice of marketing legal documents as a means of targeting senior citizens for financial exploitation.

[ 2009 c 113 s 1; 2007 c 67 s 1.]